North Dakota, session 69, SB2075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 39-32-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
5. An intrastate driver is exempt from maintaining a record of duty status if:
a. The driver operates within a one hundred fifty air-mile radius from the driver's normal
work-reporting location or from the official worksite of the vehicle;
b. At least ten consecutive hours off duty separate each twelve hours on duty;
c. The driver, except for a driver salesperson, returns to the work-reporting location and is
released from work within twelvefourteen consecutive hours;
c. At least ten consecutive hours off duty separate each fourteen hours on duty; and
d. The motor carrier maintains and retains for a period of six months accurate time records
showing the time the driver reports for duty and is released from duty each day.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2075 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2075 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State